Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [94.56] PROHIBITION ON ACQUIRING LAND AT AUCTION. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner of natural resources may not acquire real property at auction or accept real property that was acquired by a third party at auction. new text end